Hawaii statutes.
§183D-33 Shooting certain pigeons
prohibited. No person, other than the owner thereof, shall shoot, maim,
kill, or detain any Antwerp, messenger, or homing pigeon. [L 1985, c 174, pt of
§4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next